Washington statutes.
RCW 41.20.020

Officers of board—Annual report.

The mayor, or his or her designated representative, shall be ex officio chair, the clerk shall be ex officio secretary, and the treasurer shall be ex officio treasurer of said board. The secretary of said board, at the time of making his or her annual reports as said city clerk, shall annually report the condition of said fund, the receipts and disbursements on account of the same, together with a complete list of the beneficiaries of said fund, and the amounts paid to each of them.

[ 2012 c 117 s 21; 1973 1st ex.s. c 16 s 2; 1909 c 39 s 2; RRS s 9580.]